lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 p rses p
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 m nders m
SFX 3757 Y 1
SFX 3757 l se l
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 n sts n
SFX 1128 Y 1
SFX 1128 n se n
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 a ologist a
SFX 4775 Y 1
SFX 4775 n ot n
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 p rely p
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 p se p
SFX 3395 Y 1
SFX 3395 e ic's e
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 t vel t
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 t ut's t
SFX 806 Y 1
SFX 806 r sts r
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 r se r
SFX 4097 Y 1
SFX 4097 e idities e
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 e ologist e
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 d ld d
SFX 3303 Y 1
SFX 3303 d lt d
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 l ted l
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 g llied g
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 m ted m
SFX 3302 Y 1
SFX 3302 e lt e
SFX 4996 Y 1
SFX 4996 g ld g
SFX 4527 Y 1
SFX 4527 n ted n
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 g llings g
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 e ometers e
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 g lt g
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 e idly e
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 r ted r
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 s ted s
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 m pe m
SFX 2443 Y 1
SFX 2443 a le's a
SFX 3847 Y 1
SFX 3847 n pe n
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 t velled t
SFX 4016 Y 1
SFX 4016 d le's d
SFX 1151 Y 1
SFX 1151 e le's e
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 a es a
SFX 2808 Y 1
SFX 2808 d lling d
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 g le's g
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 h le's h
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 e lling e
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 c es c
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 e me e
SFX 3195 Y 1
SFX 3195 p rded p
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 i le's i
SFX 1600 Y 1
SFX 1600 d es d
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 e id e
SFX 4759 Y 1
SFX 4759 m pe's m
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 e it e
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 g lling g
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 h lling h
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 g id g
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 e ionary e
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 d siveness's d
SFX 1236 Y 1
SFX 1236 e ines e
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 l me l
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 e ified e
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 e ication's e
SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 m ped m
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 t uted t
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 d lds d
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 d ft d
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 a la's a
SFX 2812 Y 1
SFX 2812 e ling e
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 t veable t
SFX 1922 Y 1
SFX 1922 g ling g
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 a ons a
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 e la's e
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 m ping m
SFX 4151 Y 1
SFX 4151 d ft's d
SFX 4801 Y 1
SFX 4801 c ons c
SFX 4512 Y 1
SFX 4512 e ters e
SFX 3870 Y 1
SFX 3870 d ons d
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 n rrie's n
SFX 4027 Y 1
SFX 4027 i la's i
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 e ons e
SFX 3328 Y 1
SFX 3328 e led e
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 e lie e
SFX 4930 Y 1
SFX 4930 l mer's l
SFX 1924 Y 1
SFX 1924 g led g
SFX 4511 Y 1
SFX 4511 l ters l
SFX 3750 Y 1
SFX 3750 c sh c
SFX 4510 Y 1
SFX 4510 m ters m
SFX 3151 Y 1
SFX 3151 d sh d
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 d ge d
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 e ily e
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 n rine's n
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 e ge e
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 e sh e
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 t vable t
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 n ons n
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 n rry's n
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 s ters s
SFX 3614 Y 1
SFX 3614 t vage t
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 d nce's d
SFX 4900 Y 1
SFX 4900 e nce's e
SFX 4613 Y 1
SFX 4613 l sh l
SFX 4608 Y 1
SFX 4608 p sher's p
SFX 3749 Y 1
SFX 3749 m sh m
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 b ckets b
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 n sh n
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 p sh p
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 a ses a
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 a de a
SFX 4233 Y 1
SFX 4233 b de b
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 a ler's a
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 r sh r
SFX 4699 Y 1
SFX 4699 p rges p
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 c de c
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 l nce's l
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 c ses c
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 c ty c
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 c sm's c
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 d ses d
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 e ses e
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 d ty d
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 e istic e
SFX 4753 Y 1
SFX 4753 f ph f
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 e ler's e
SFX 4938 Y 1
SFX 4938 e man's e
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 m phies m
SFX 4150 Y 1
SFX 4150 d fted d
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 e igh's e
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 m ph m
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 n ses n
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 n sm's n
SFX 2687 Y 1
SFX 2687 p ses p
SFX 1390 Y 1
SFX 1390 r ses r
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 s ty s
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 e ify e
SFX 4423 Y 1
SFX 4423 t uches t
SFX 4053 Y 1
SFX 4053 e itor e
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 c zer c
SFX 4897 Y 1
SFX 4897 l ncing l
SFX 4896 Y 1
SFX 4896 m ncing m
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 m tically m
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 i uses i
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 d eding d
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 e oid e
SFX 4449 Y 1
SFX 4449 e tt's e
SFX 3347 Y 1
SFX 3347 a ita's a
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 e iting e
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 m ngers m
SFX 4678 Y 1
SFX 4678 n rita n
SFX 3346 Y 1
SFX 3346 e ita's e
SFX 1953 Y 1
SFX 1953 e iers e
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 e ism e
SFX 1856 Y 1
SFX 1856 d sion's d
SFX 3639 Y 1
SFX 3639 t ud's t
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 g llow g
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 t uses t
SFX 3718 Y 1
SFX 3718 p ssier p
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 s zer s
SFX 1534 Y 1
SFX 1534 d ry's d
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 p tch p
SFX 1952 Y 1
SFX 1952 e ification's e
SFX 3107 Y 1
SFX 3107 r tch r
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 i ry's i
SFX 3574 Y 1
SFX 3574 y zer y
SFX 1863 Y 1
SFX 1863 l ry's l
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 e oids e
SFX 1862 Y 1
SFX 1862 n ry's n
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 d sible d
SFX 3773 Y 1
SFX 3773 p ry's p
SFX 3602 Y 1
SFX 3602 f ver f
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 e iest e
SFX 4856 Y 1
SFX 4856 m nkier m
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 d se's d
SFX 4627 Y 1
SFX 4627 e se's e
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 g kes g
SFX 4051 Y 1
SFX 4051 e itors e
SFX 4556 Y 1
SFX 4556 d ster's d
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 p ver p
SFX 4545 Y 1
SFX 4545 n sty n
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 l nter l
SFX 4843 Y 1
SFX 4843 m nter m
SFX 3601 Y 1
SFX 3601 s ver s
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 n se's n
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 t ver t
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 r sty r
SFX 4971 Y 1
SFX 4971 g lking g
SFX 3638 Y 1
SFX 3638 t ughing t
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 r se's r
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 b cks b
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 n ster's n
SFX 4589 Y 1
SFX 4589 a sing a
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 r urers r
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 d ffling d
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 c sing c
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 r ster's r
SFX 4972 Y 1
SFX 4972 g lker g
SFX 4716 Y 1
SFX 4716 n reen n
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 a sa's a
SFX 3428 Y 1
SFX 3428 d ges d
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 e ges e
SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 e sa's e
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 a um a
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 r urless r
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 a ey a
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 e nda e
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 c um c
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 t ving's t
SFX 4706 Y 1
SFX 4706 n rer n
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 n ris n
SFX 4175 Y 1
SFX 4175 a et's a
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 e um e
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 n sing n
SFX 1872 Y 1
SFX 1872 p rer p
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 p sing p
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 p rding p
SFX 4641 Y 1
SFX 4641 n sa's n
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 r sing r
SFX 4824 Y 1
SFX 4824 e ography's e
SFX 3809 Y 1
SFX 3809 n rena n
SFX 3781 Y 1
SFX 3781 n rri's n
SFX 2536 Y 1
SFX 2536 a een's a
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 e ishness's e
SFX 3657 Y 1
SFX 3657 e ton e
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 o um o
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 e ometer e
SFX 2301 Y 1
SFX 2301 t ughs t
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 e ner e
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 g llion g
SFX 3350 Y 1
SFX 3350 a ists a
SFX 4890 Y 1
SFX 4890 g nder's g
SFX 4508 Y 1
SFX 4508 d th's d
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 e th's e
SFX 1643 Y 1
SFX 1643 r urer r
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 e ists e
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 s ton s
SFX 3495 Y 1
SFX 3495 a de's a
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 a ita a
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 e ional e
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 m nder's m
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 p rm p
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 d siveness d
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 c de's c
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 e ita e
SFX 2841 Y 1
SFX 2841 e ited e
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 a ums a
SFX 4096 Y 1
SFX 4096 e idity e
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 c sations c
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 c ums c
SFX 3092 Y 1
SFX 3092 r th's r
SFX 3678 Y 1
SFX 3678 s th's s
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 e ially e
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 e ionally e
SFX 3791 Y 1
SFX 3791 p rm's p
SFX 4403 Y 1
SFX 4403 o ums o
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 n rth n
SFX 3745 Y 1
SFX 3745 d shes d
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 d sively d
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 c zation's c
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 a el's a
SFX 1361 Y 1
SFX 1361 e ure e
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 e il's e
SFX 3719 Y 1
SFX 3719 p sser p
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 g il's g
SFX 4566 Y 1
SFX 4566 r sser r
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 m ndered m
