lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Chrysa/1,4009
Kile/1,18,31,784,955,1963,2171,3322,3323
Myrta/595,688,2443
Nobe/1,347,398,844,1151
Pooh/1,4015
Shari/157,261,719,2758,4027,4028
Vere/1,111,117,120,138,619,854,1237,1322,1579,1929,1977,2218,2858
Zara/1,116,149,580,595,1782,2181,2825
atone/41,42,44,3395
bliss/1,3,4,8,108,165,177,205,240,1374,1479,2082,2653
consul/1,2,26,48,57,82,97,119,127,142,150,188,190,199,484,494,878,918,1375,1525,1526,3101,3102,3296,3685,3951,4534,4926,4930
dour/5,9,10,11,17,38,991,1390,2099,2107,3152,4620
extend/2,3,4,9,12,14,169,186,198,316,376,431,667,855,1388,1609,1666,1854,1856,2098,2205,2339,2340,2341,3145,4596,4597
frog/1,2,69,78,90,112,131,135,2864,3919,3927
grill/2,3,4,8,9,12,16,21,300,350,3757
hind/2,12,14,152,156,481,752,778,2219,2507,2896,3428
idea/1,2,3877,3878,4815
interfere/2,6,7,13,15,19,93,334,369,452,637,774,1698,3251,3252,3253
knee/1,2,3,6,46,49,121,160,168,212,1433,1495,1797,2024,2805,2807,2809,3302,3852,3984,4768
lava/1,2,549,626,1095,1782,3069,4464
lord/1,2,3,4,5,32,150,188,199,232,238,269,270,312,359,1394,1399,1534,1600
lure/2,6,7,13,15,525,1744,1954,1955,4095
mart/399,2606,3607,3608,4373,4374
maze/1,2,7,13,132,144,211,403,547,552,1615
meld/2,3,4,3250,3870,3873
multiple/1,2,26,63,97,132,163,1468,1742,1953,3392,4105,4106
noon/1,2,3,4,32,585,679,1027,1048,1128,1252,1253,1533,1651,2320,2646,2679,2691,2692
parasite/1,2,1701,2145,2759,3256
phenomena/1,2,49,381,541,554,2753,3877,3878,4815
plain/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,17,26,38,63,97,428,438,439,508,878,2642,3138,3663,3664,4527
pulp/1,2,3,4,9,18,34,36,56,72,74,249,448,484,617,728,742,1076,2687,2693,3735,3752,4625
rabbi/1,2,26,48,57,63,82,97,119,1577,2178,2401,2790,4903,4985
real/2,5,9,10,17,38,45,47,58,59,64,65,67,73,79,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,157,166,244,257,261,265,271,274,290,291,295,301,389,453,467,657,1077,1320,1509,1580,1583,1715,2441,2452,2475,2859,3304,3567,3951,4039,4085,4086,4930,4955,4956,4957
ream/1,2,3,4,14,3838,4746,4757
recoup/2,3,4,88,4651,4652
revers/1,3,4,8,9,12,16,28,55,60,62,137,355,431,513,667,855,1328,1374,1734,2082,2194,2205,2645,2658
revise/1936,2188,2840,2841
roar/2,3,4,9,12,14,20,29,51,806,882,1122,1286,1381,1529
room/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,18,34,36,37,56,72,74,108,282,306,432,671,907,953,1065,1309,3681,4484,4510,4516,4528,4563
rose/1,2,6,7,132,142,144,249,336,343,344,411,448,459,547,728,765,1161,1352,1837,1943,2071,2627,4072,4075,4261,4512
sale/1,35,186,376,464,489,509,619,637,774,955,1236,1698,2171,2697,3160,4091,4913,4915
salon/945,1697
salt/1,2,3,4,5,9,10,11,12,14,18,34,36,37,38,50,56,72,74,89,104,115,162,223,486,503,515,584,593,633,655,656,765,1358,1824,1825,2291,2293,3038,3614,4378,4379
scam/1,2,231,237,3837,4759
scan/2,151,159,210,289,519,1291,1292,1387,3847
sere/2,6,7,13,84,163,736,1015,1080,1081,1234,1584,1644,1698,1701,1977,2065,2145,2218,2894,3257,3425,3430
shad/1,2,3,4,8,9,16,18,21,29,32,34,36,56,72,74,129,611,682,942,943,1060,1072,1245,2220,2363,2738,3303,3432,3813,4016,4017,4036,4149,4150,4151,4770,4771
simple/2,6,7,10,13,17,84,146,262,525,1116,1267,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1588,1814,2189,2203,2477,2996,3377
smell/2,3,4,9,12,18,34,35,36,56,72,74,351,387,1738,3098,4511
sped/518,3303
strange/5,10,11,13,15,17,19,84,179,184,844,1726,2812,3326,3328,4008
substitute/13,54,175,391,2195
sunburn/1,2,3,4,26,730,881,1054
swell/2,3,4,9,29,32,38,327,442,818,3098,4511
tali/1359
telepathic/25,136
time/1,2,5,6,7,13,15,19,50,96,122,164,172,181,219,232,238,246,269,270,311,332,359,388,600,635,1074,1212,1213,1228,1316,1411,1510,1744,1745,1954,1955,2673,2833,3337,3699,4033,4095,4096,4097,4099
triangular/5,126,134,771,805,988,1046,1117,1118,3682
trot/2,48,57,82,116,119,127,149,447,471,479,486,503,1358,1518,1639,1835,2062,2301,2607,3046,3060,3617,4402
twig/1,2,131,135,597,644,645,686,741,843,901
unlit/656,2291,4375
void/2,3,4,9,10,11,12,35,4016,4017
weld/2,3,4,9,12,14,29,35,3151,3745
whore/115,319,371,400,3328
word/1,2,3,4,18,29,32,34,36,50,56,72,74,129,167,172,185,195,564,652,721,1393,1394,1399,1408,1539,1668,2444,2671,3093,3330,3704,3834,4018,4508,4554,4558
